New York, session 2025-2026, A11189.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 120-dd to read as follows: 3 § 120-dd. Notification to department of environmental conservation. 4 Upon the adoption of a resolution by a municipal corporation identifying 5 a property within its jurisdiction as being in violation of any local 6 law, ordinance, code, rule or regulation due to the storage of illegal 7 or hazardous substances, such municipal corporation shall notify the 8 department of environmental conservation. 9 § 2. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a new 10 section 3-0323 to read as follows: 11 § 3-0323. Municipal notification; federal reporting and remediation. 12 1. Within six weeks of receipt of a notification made pursuant to 13 section one hundred twenty-dd of the general municipal law, the depart- 14 ment shall (a) notify the United States environmental protection agency 15 about the affected site and (b) develop and issue a remediation plan for 16 such site. 17 2. The remediation plan shall include the proposed actions of the 18 department with respect to securing the affected site, removing illegal 19 or hazardous substances, and protecting public health, safety and the 20 environment. Such plan shall be implemented and commenced no later than 21 the expiration of the six-week period following notification pursuant to 22 subdivision one of this section. 23 3. The department shall: 24 (a) provide the affected municipality with a copy of the remediation 25 plan and inform such municipality of all actions taken pursuant to such 26 plan, including timelines for implementation and completion; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15692-01-6 A. 11189 2 1 (b) confirm that the United States environmental protection agency has 2 been notified in accordance with subdivision one of this section. 3 4. For the purposes of this section, "municipality" shall mean a coun- 4 ty, town, city and village. 5 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 6 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 7 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 8 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 9 on or before such effective date.